District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.23

Fund balance requirements for inaugural committees.

Any balance in the inaugural committee fund shall be transferred only to a nonprofit organization, within the meaning of section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code , operating in good standing in the District of Columbia for a minimum of one calendar year before the date of any transfer, or to a constituent-service program pursuant to § 1-1163.38.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 323, 59 DCR 1862